Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB1.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.370 is repealed, reenacted, and amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent shall be the executive agent of the board that appoints him or her and shall meet with the
board, except when his or her own tenure, salary, or the administration of his or her office is under
consideration. As executive officer of the board, the superintendent shall see that the laws relating to the
schools, the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education, and the regulations and
policies of the district board of education are carried into effect. He or she may administer the oath required by
the board of education to any teacher or other person. He or she shall be the professional adviser of the board
in all matters. He or she shall prepare, under the direction of the board, all rules, regulations, bylaws, and
statements of policy for approval and adoption by the board. He or she shall have general supervision, subject
to the control of the board of education, of the general conduct of the schools, the course of instruction, the
discipline of pupils, and the management of business affairs. He or she shall be responsible for the hiring and
dismissal of all personnel in the district.
(2) For a county school district in a county with a consolidated local government adopted under KRS Chapter 67C
or having five hundred thousand (500,000) or more inhabitants:
(a) A local board of education shall:
1. Delegate authority to the superintendent over the district's day-to-day operations and
implementation of the board-approved strategic plan and budget in a manner that promotes the
efficient, timely operation of the district, including but not limited to the authority over contracts
related to daily operations of the district, pupil transportation, personnel matters, and the
organizational structure of administrative staff;
2. [Except as expressly required by statute, including subparagraphs 3. and 5. of this paragraph, not
meet more than once every four (4) weeks for the purpose of approving necessary administrative
matters;
3. ]By December 1 each year, approve a rolling five (5)[three (3)] year strategic plan for the district
that outlines student outcome[achievement] goals, faculty and staff improvement goals, facility
and infrastructure improvement, and other key objectives that the superintendent and board
believe are in the best interest of student outcomes and the community;
3. Review and approve a rolling three (3) year projection of expenses and revenues;
4. Approve an annual budget for the district, which shall include any budgetary decisions relevant
to the district's ability to obtain necessary revenue, including tax revenue, in accordance with the
requirements of state law and regulation;
5. By December[November] 1 each year, oversee:
a. An annual audit of the financial dealings of the district and the reporting of key financial
performance data in order to ensure fair and accurate reporting to the board; and
b. An annual review of student performance in the district and the reporting of key student
performance data to ensure compliance with state and federal law and accurate reporting
to the board;
6. Recruit and hire the superintendent and negotiate the terms of employment and compensation of
a prospective superintendent;
7. Complete an annual review of the superintendent's performance with regard to the duties
assigned in subsection (1) of this section and paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
8. Be responsible for the dismissal of the superintendent;

CHAPTER 153 5
(b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in subsection (1) of this section, the superintendent shall:
1. Provide a quarterly, informational report to the board on the administrative actions taken by the
superintendent to carry out the district's daily operations and implementation of the strategic plan
as well as a budget to actual financial update;
2. Prepare all rules, regulations, bylaws, and statements of policy for approval and adoption by the
board, with approval not to be withheld without a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board to deny
approval or adoption;
3. Supervise the general conduct of the schools, the course of instruction, the discipline of pupils,
the employment matters of all employees and contractors, and the management of business
affairs of the district;
4. Be responsible for the hiring, employment terms, dismissal, and organizational structure of all
personnel in the district in compliance with all laws and in a manner that best serves the students
of the district; and
5. Notwithstanding any law that assigns an administrative duty, responsibility, or authority to a
board of education, or other law to the contrary, be responsible for any administrative duty not
explicitly granted to the board under paragraph (a) of this subsection;[ and]
(c) If the school district[county] adopts the provisions of the Kentucky Model Procurement Code, the
board shall authorize the superintendent to approve purchases, in accordance with small purchase
procedures adopted by the board, for any contract for which a determination is made that the aggregate
amount of the contract does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);[.]
(d) The board shall authorize the superintendent to approve a line-item transfer within its annual budget as
she or he deems necessary, provided that the aggregate amount of all transfers do[any individual
transfer does] not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per quarter. The
superintendent shall provide a quarterly report to the board on any purchases made under this
subsection; and
(e) Any purchase or transfer completed pursuant to paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection shall be
within the approved budget of the district, aligned to the strategic plan of the district, and reported to
the board at the next regularly scheduled board meeting.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version